South Dakota, session 2026, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-11-52 be AMENDED:
10-11-52. Failure on the part of the Department of Revenue to transmit the
certificate required by § 10-11-51, on or before the fourth Monday of August, does not in
any way invalidate the assessment or tax levied, if the certificate is transmitted to the
county auditor within a reasonable time.

26.376.15 2 22
An Act to clarify when certification of values is transmitted to the county.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 22
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 22 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB22 ENROLLED